Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Chapter 102. Appellate Procedure

§§ 2381,
2382.
Repealed. 1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 2383.
Time for filing notice of appeal.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a notice of appeal shall be filed within 30 days from the date of the entry of any appealable judgment, order, ruling, decree or sentence of any court, commission, board, agency, or department of the State or any political subdivision thereof.
The Supreme Court may by rule provide for extension of the time for appeal to allow a cross appeal or for cause.

HISTORY:

1959, No. 261

, § 47; amended

1961, No. 181

, § 2;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 56, eff. March 29, 1972.

§§ 2384,
2385.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 2386.
Passing causes before final judgment.

Before final judgment in civil actions or proceedings in the Superior Courts, an appeal to the Supreme Court for the determination of questions of law may be taken in such manner and under such conditions as the Supreme Court may by rule provide.

In its discretion and before final judgment, a Superior Court may permit an appeal to be taken by the respondent or the State in a criminal cause to the Supreme Court for determination of questions of law. The Supreme Court shall hear and determine the questions and render final judgment thereon or remand the proceedings as justice and the state of the cause may require.

HISTORY:

Added

1959, No. 261

, § 50; amended

1965, No. 194

, § 10, eff. July 1, 1965, operative Feb. 1, 1967;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 57, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 74, 74a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.

§ 2387.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.

§ 2388.
Repealed.
1973, No. 118, § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.

§§ 2389,
2390.
Repealed.
1971, No. 185 (Adj. Sess.), § 237, eff. March 29, 1972.